hu: Hangbővítési módszer: Letölthető/alkalmazáson belüli tartalomcsomagok; Csak külső hangforrás (MIDI/audio); Belső bővítőkártya; Nincs bővítés; SD/microSD-kártya importálás; USB-importálás; Egyéb
zh-TW: 音色擴充方式: 下載/應用程式內容包; 僅限外部音源 (MIDI/音訊); 內部擴充卡; 無擴充; SD/microSD 卡匯入; USB 匯入; 其他
fr: Mode d’extension des sons: Packs de contenu par téléchargement/application; Source sonore externe uniquement (MIDI/audio); Carte d’extension interne; Pas d’extension; Importation par carte SD/microSD; Importation par USB; Autre
bg-BG: Метод на звуково усилване/разпространение: Изтегляне/пакети със съдържание през приложение; Само външен източник на звук (MIDI/аудио); Вътрешна карта за разширение; Без разширение; Импорт от SD/microSD карта; Импорт от USB; Друго
vi: Phương pháp mở rộng âm thanh: Tải xuống/gói nội dung ứng dụng; Chỉ nguồn âm thanh ngoài (MIDI/âm thanh); Thẻ mở rộng bộ nhớ trong; Không mở rộng; Nhập từ thẻ nhớ SD/microSD; Nhập từ USB; Khác
sl-SI: Način razširitve zvoka: Prenos/paketi vsebine aplikacije; Samo zunanji zvočni vir (MIDI/zvok); Notranja razširitvena kartica; Brez razširitve; Uvoz s kartice SD/microSD; Uvoz prek USB-ja; Drugo
zh-CN: 声膨胀法: 下载/应用内容包; 仅外部音源（MIDI/音频）; 内部扩展卡; 无扩展; SD/microSD 卡导入; USB 导入; 其他
de: Methode zur Sounderweiterung: Download/App-Inhaltspakete; Nur externe Klangquelle (MIDI/Audio); Interne Erweiterungskarte; Keine Erweiterung; SD/microSD-Karten-Import; USB-Import; Andere
hr-HR: Metoda širenja zvuka: Preuzimanje / paketi sadržaja iz aplikacije; Samo vanjski izvor zvuka (MIDI/zvuk); Unutarnja kartica za proširenje; Bez proširenja; Uvoz sa SD / microSD kartice; Uvoz s USB-a; Ostalo
el: Μέθοδος επέκτασης ήχου: Λήψη/πακέτα περιεχομένου εφαρμογής; Εξωτερική πηγή ήχου μόνο (MIDI/ήχος); Εσωτερική κάρτα επέκτασης; Χωρίς επέκταση; Εισαγωγή από κάρτα SD/microSD; Εισαγωγή από USB; Άλλο
en: Sound expansion method: Download/app content packs; External sound source only (MIDI/audio); Internal expansion card; No expansion; SD/microSD card import; USB import; Other
ro-RO: Metodă de extindere a sunetelor: Descărcare/pachete de conținut din aplicație; Doar sursă de sunet externă (MIDI/audio); Card de extensie intern; Fără extensie; Import de pe card SD/microSD; Import prin USB; Altele
pl: Metoda zwiększenia liczebności dźwięków: Pobieranie / pakiety z aplikacji; Tylko zewnętrzne źródło (MIDI/audio); Wewnętrzna karta rozszerzeń; Brak możliwości rozszerzenia; Import z karty SD/microSD; Import z USB; Inne
sk-SK: Metóda zvukovej expanzie: Balíky obsahu na stiahnutie/v aplikácii; Iba externý zdroj zvuku (MIDI/audio); Interná rozširujúca karta; Bez možnosti rozšírenia; Import z SD/microSD karty; Import z USB; Iná
sv: Ljudexpansionsmetod: Nedladdning/innehållspaket i app; Endast extern ljudkälla (MIDI/ljud); Internt expansionskort; Ingen expansion; Import via SD/microSD-kort; USB-import; Övrigt
cs: Metoda expanze zvuku: Stahování / balíčky obsahu aplikací; Pouze externí zdroj zvuku (MIDI/audio); Interní rozšiřující karta; Bez možnosti rozšíření; Import ze SD/microSD karty; Import z USB; Jiné
pt-PT: Método de expansão sonora: Packs de conteúdos para transferência/aplicação; Apenas fonte de som externa (MIDI/áudio); Cartão de expansão interno; Sem expansão; Importação por cartão SD/microSD; Importação por USB; Outro
lt-LT: Garso išplėtimo būdas: Atsisiuntimas / programėlės turinio paketai; Tik išorinis garso šaltinis (MIDI / garsas); Vidinė išplėtimo plokštė; Be išplėtimo; SD / „microSD“ kortelės importavimas; USB importavimas; Kita
fi: Äänen laajentamismenetelmä: Lataukset / sovelluksen sisältöpaketit; Vain ulkoinen äänilähde (MIDI/ääni); Sisäinen laajennuskortti; Ei laajennusta; SD-/microSD-kortin tuonti; USB-tuonti; Muu
tr: Ses genişletme yöntemi: İndirme/uygulama içerik paketleri; Yalnızca harici ses kaynağı (MIDI/ses); Dahili genişletme kartı; Genişletme yok; SD/microSD kart ile içe aktarma; USB ile içe aktarma; Diğer
ja: サウンド拡張方法: ダウンロード / アプリコンテンツパック; 外部音源のみ (MIDI / オーディオ); 内部拡張カード; 拡張なし; SD / microSD カードインポート; USB インポート; その他
th: วิธีการขยายเสียง: ดาวน์โหลด/แพ็กเกจเนื้อหาของแอป; แหล่งกำเนิดเสียงภายนอกเท่านั้น (MIDI/เสียง); การ์ดส่วนขยายภายใน; ไม่มีส่วนขยาย; นำเข้าด้วยการ์ด SD/microSD; นำเข้าด้วย USB; อื่นๆ
nl: Geluid uitbreidingsmethode: Download-/app-contentpacks; Alleen externe geluidsbron (MIDI/audio); Interne uitbreidingskaart; Geen uitbreiding; SD-/microSD-kaartimport; USB-import; Anders
ko: 음향 확장 방법: 다운로드/앱 콘텐츠 팩; 외부 사운드 소스 전용(MIDI/오디오); 내부 확장 카드; 확장 불가; SD/microSD 카드 가져오기; USB 가져오기; 기타
ru: Способ расширения звуков: Загрузка/пакеты контента из приложения; Только внешний источник звука (MIDI/аудио); Внутренняя карта расширения; Без расширения; Импорт с SD/microSD-карты; Импорт через USB; Другое
nb: Lydutvidelsesmetode: Nedlasting/innholdspakker fra app; Kun ekstern lydkilde (MIDI/lyd); Internt utvidelseskort; Ingen utvidelse; Import via SD/microSD-kort; USB-import; Annet
pt-BR: Som expansão método: Pacotes de conteúdo via download/app; Apenas fonte de som externa (MIDI/áudio); Cartão de expansão interno; Sem expansão; Importação via cartão SD/microSD; Importação via USB; Outro
da: Metode til udvidelse af lydbibliotek: Download/app-indholdspakker; Kun ekstern lydkilde (MIDI/lyd); Internt udvidelseskort; Ingen udvidelse; Import fra SD/microSD-kort; USB-import; Andet
it: Metodo di espansione del suono: Download/pacchetti di contenuti app; Solo sorgente sonora esterna (MIDI/audio); Scheda di espansione interna; Nessuna espansione; Importazione da scheda SD/microSD; Importazione da USB; Altro
es: Método de expansión del sonido: Descarga o paquetes de contenido de aplicación; Solo fuente de sonido externa (MIDI o audio); Tarjeta de expansión interna; Sin expansión; Importación con tarjeta SD o microSD; Importación por USB; Otro